Maryland, session 2025, HB0623.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0623*

HOUSE BILL 623
Article – Estates and Trusts
2–208.
(L) (1) THE REGISTER OF EACH COUNTY AND BALTIMORE CITY SHALL
COORDINATE TO ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN A CENTRALIZED WEBSITE FOR USE BY
ALL REGISTERS TO PUBLISH NOTICE AS REQUIRED UNDER THIS ARTICLE.
(2) NOTICE PUBLISHED ON THE WEBSITE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL SATISFY ANY NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER THIS ARTICLE TO BE PUBLISHED IN
A NEWSPAPER OF GENERAL CIRCULATION IF A DECEDENT’S HEIRS ARE LIMITED TO:
(I) A SPOUSE;
(II) A REGISTERED DOMESTIC PARTNER;
(III) LINEAL ANCESTORS; AND
(IV) LINEAL DESCENDANTS.
2–210.
(A) Within five days after [receiving the text of the first published newspaper
notice] OR THE INITIAL WEBSITE PUBLICATION OF NOTICE as provided in § 7–103 of
this article [and the written notice from the personal representative of the names and
addresses of the heirs and legatees as provided in § 7–104 of this article], the register shall
forward to each [such person] HEIR AND LEGATEE a copy of the [newspaper] OR WEBSITE
notice published according to § 7–104 of this article, in the manner prescribed in § 1–103(a)
of this article, directed according to the information received from the personal
representative.
(B) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2025, AND EACH DECEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE REGISTER OF EACH COUNTY AND BALTIMORE CITY SHALL, FOR
THE 12–MONTH PERIOD ENDING ON THE PREVIOUS OCTOBER 31, REPORT TO THE
MARYLAND REGISTER OF WILLS ASSOCIATION ON THE NUMBER OF ESTATES FOR
WHICH AN INTERESTED PARTY OBJECTED TO THE APPOINTMENT OF A PERSONAL
REPRESENTATIVE, FILED A CLAIM AGAINST THE ESTATE, OR CHALLENGED A WILL
BECAUSE THE INTERESTED PARTY:
(I) DID NOT RECEIVE A NOTICE FROM THE REGISTER THROUGH
THE MAIL; OR
(II) LEARNED ABOUT THE OPENING OF THE ESTATE BY
READING A NOTICE IN A NEWSPAPER.

HOUSE BILL 623 3
(2) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2025, AND EACH DECEMBER 31
THEREAFTER, THE MARYLAND REGISTER OF WILLS ASSOCIATION SHALL REPORT
TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE INFORMATION
REPORTED BY THE REGISTERS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
DISAGGREGATED BY TYPE AND JURISDICTION.
5–403.
(a) (1) Notice that judicial probate has been requested shall be given promptly
by the register to all interested persons as shown in the documents in the register’s file.
(2) The petitioner shall advise the register of the names and addresses of
all interested persons of whom the petitioner learns before the granting of judicial probate,
and the register shall give notice to the persons in the manner prescribed by § 1–103(a)(1)
of this article.
(3) In addition, the register shall publish a notice [in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county where judicial probate is requested, once a week] OR ON
THE CENTRALIZED WEBSITE ESTABLISHED UNDER § 2–208 OF THIS ARTICLE for 2
[successive] weeks.
(b) The notice required by this section shall be in the following form:
IN THE ORPHANS’ COURT FOR ...............................................................................
In re:
ESTATE OF
......................................................................................................................................................
Deceased
TO ALL PERSONS INTERESTED IN THE ESTATE OF .....................................................
.................................................................................................................................................. :
YOU ARE HEREBY NOTIFIED THAT A Petition has been filed in the court by
……………… for judicial probate, including the appointment of a personal representative
for the estate; and that the Petition will be heard at …………….on the ………………………
day of ……., 20…., or at a subsequent time or other place to which the hearing may be
adjourned or transferred.
……………………………………
Register of Wills
5–503.
(a) As used in this subtitle, “leasehold property” refers only to a leasehold interest
in real property.
(b) (1) [A foreign personal representative shall:]

HOUSE BILL 623
(1) [Publish once PUBLISH A NOTICE:
(I) ONCE a week for 3 successive weeks a notice in a newspaper of
general circulation in each county in which real or leasehold property of the decedent was
located,; OR
(II) FOR 3 SUCCESSIVE WEEKS ON THE CENTRALIZED WEBSITE
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 2–208 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(2) A NOTICE PUBLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL CONTAIN containing] THE REGISTER SHALL, FOR 3 WEEKS,
PUBLISH ON THE CENTRALIZED WEBSITE ESTABLISHED UNDER § 2–208 OF THIS
ARTICLE NOTICE CONTAINING THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION REGARDING A
FOREIGN PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVE AND THE ESTATE REPRESENTED:
(i) The foreign personal representative’s appointment;
(ii) The foreign personal representative’s name and address;
(iii) The name and address of the foreign personal representative’s
Maryland agent for service of process on file with the register in each county where real or
leasehold property was located;
(iv) The name of the court that appointed the foreign personal
representative;
(v) A brief description of all real and leasehold property owned by
the decedent in the county;
(vi) The date of the decedent’s death; and
(vii) The following statement: All persons having claims against the
decedent must present their claims to the undersigned, or file them with the register of
wills on or before the earlier of the following dates:
1. 6 months from the date of the decedent’s death; or
2. 2 months after the foreign personal representative mails
or otherwise delivers to the creditor a copy of this published notice or other written notice,
notifying the creditor that the creditor’s claim will be barred unless the creditor presents
the claim within 2 months from the mailing or other delivery of the notice[;].
(2) (3) [Record in each appropriate office of the register a certification
that the foreign personal representative has published notice as required; and

HOUSE BILL 623 5
(3) (4)] Promptly after a proceeding under this subtitle has been
instituted, A FOREIGN PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVE SHALL comply with the provisions
of § 7–103.1 of this article.
(c) (1) Within the time periods provided under subsection (b) of this section, a
creditor may file with the register a written statement of the creditor’s claim, in the form
set forth in § 8–104(c) of this article, and if a foreign personal representative has instituted
a proceeding under this subtitle deliver or mail a copy of the statement to the personal
representative.
(2) (i) The register shall maintain a book known as the “Claims Against
Nonresident Decedents” book in which every claim and release shall be recorded.
(ii) Unless and until a release of a validly recorded claim has been
recorded, or the claim has finally been determined in favor of the personal representative,
the claim shall constitute a lien against the real and leasehold property owned by the
decedent in the county at the time of death for a period of 12 years from date of death.
(iii) If the personal representative is empowered by the will to sell the
property the claim shall constitute a lien against the net proceeds from the sale.
7–103.
(a) [(1)] After the appointment of a personal representative, the register shall
[have a notice of the appointment published in a newspaper of general circulation in the
county of appointment OR ON THE CENTRALIZED WEBSITE ESTABLISHED UNDER §
2–208 OF THIS ARTICLE once a week in 3 successive weeks], FOR 3 WEEKS, PUBLISH
NOTICE ON THE CENTRALIZED WEBSITE ESTABLISHED UNDER § 2–208 OF THIS
ARTICLE, announcing the appointment and address of the personal representative, and
notifying creditors of the estate to present their claims.
[(2) The personal representative shall file or have filed with the register a
certification that a notice has been published.]
(b) The notice of appointment shall be substantially in the following form:
“To all persons interested in the estate of .......................:
This is to give notice that the undersigned, ……...…whose address is ………….. was,
on …….., appointed personal representative of the estate of …………. who died on ……
(with) (without) a will.
All interested persons or unpaid claimants having any objection to the appointment
of the personal representative shall file the same with the register of wills on or before 6
months from the date of the appointment.
All persons having any objection to the probate of the will of the decedent shall file
the same with the register of wills on or before 6 months from the date of the appointment.

HOUSE BILL 623
All persons having claims against the decedent must present their claims to the
undersigned, or file them with the register of wills on or before the earlier of the following
dates:
(1) 6 months from the date of the decedent’s death; or
(2) 2 months after the personal representative mails or otherwise delivers
to the creditor a copy of this published notice or other written notice, notifying the creditor
that the creditor’s claim will be barred unless the creditor presents the claim within 2
months from the mailing or other delivery of the notice.
Any claim not filed on or before that date, or any extension provided by law, is
unenforceable thereafter.
………………………………………
Personal representative
Date of first publication:
……………………………”
7–104.
(a) Not later than 20 days after the appointment of a personal representative, the
personal representative shall deliver to the register the text of the first published
[newspaper] OR WEBSITE notice of the appointment and shall advise the register of the
names and addresses of the heirs of the decedent and of the legatees to the extent known
by the personal representative, so that the register may issue the notices provided in §
2–210 of this article.
(b) The provisions of this section do not apply to a successor personal
representative if notice under this section has been given previously, or to a person
appointed pursuant to judicial probate.
9–112.
(a) (1) If the personal representative cannot obtain agreement from all
interested persons entitled to share in the distribution of the property, the personal
representative may apply to the court to make distribution.
(2) The court shall designate a day and direct the giving of notice to all
interested persons concerned.
(3) The court may appoint two disinterested individuals, not related to the
interested persons to make an appropriate division for distribution, or recommend to the
court a sale of part or all of the property, and the court shall direct the distribution it
considers appropriate.
(b) If a majority in relation to value fails to appear on the appointed day, or appear
and object to the distribution suggested, or if the court considers a sale of part or all of the
property more appropriate and advantageous, the personal representative shall make the
sale or sales and divide the proceeds, together with unsold property, as the court directs.

HOUSE BILL 623 7
(c) If the personal representative has reason to believe that there may be one or
more interested persons whose names or addresses are not known to the personal
representative, or if it is not known to the personal representative if an interested person
is still surviving, the personal representative may appoint a meeting of all interested
persons to be held on a day the court designates.
(d) (1) The personal representative shall give notice to all interested persons
known to the personal representative, and THE REGISTER shall, FOR 3 WEEKS, publish a
notice of the meeting [once a week in 3 successive weeks, in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county of the personal representative’s appointment,] OR ON THE
CENTRALIZED WEBSITE ESTABLISHED UNDER § 2–208 OF THIS ARTICLE stating the
time, date, place, and purpose of the meeting which shall be held no sooner than 20 days
after the first publication.
(2) The personal representative shall also take other steps and make other
efforts to learn the names and addresses of additional interested persons as the court
considers appropriate under the circumstances.
(e) (1) On the date of the meeting, distribution of the net estate shall be made
under the direction and control of the court.
(2) Distribution by the personal representative in accordance with the
direction of the court at the meeting protects and indemnifies the personal representative
acting in obedience to it.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.